Illinois, session 104th, SB73.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act is 5amended by adding Section 11.7 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 620/11.7 new)7    Sec. 11.7. Baby foods; toxic elements.8    (a) In this Section:9    "Baby food" means food packaged in a jar, pouch, tub, or 10box sold specifically for babies and children under the age of 112 years old. "Baby food" does not include infant formula as 12defined in Section 2.28.13    "Final baby food product" means the finished product of 14baby food with a unique universal product code (UPC). "Final 15baby food product" does not include the individual ingredients 16that are in baby food.17    "Manufacturer" includes a food manufacturer, food 18processor, and food packer.19    "Product label" means a display of written, printed, or 20graphic material that is affixed to a product or the product's 21immediate container.22    "Product shelf life" means the time, measured in number of 23months, between the date of manufacture and the date of   SB0073 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 02950 RPS 12966 b1expiration for a final baby food product.2    "Production aggregate" means a quantity of product that is 3intended to have uniform composition, character, and quality 4and is produced according to a master manufacturing order.5    "Proficient laboratory" means a laboratory that:6        (1) is accredited under the standards of the 7    International Organization for 8    Standardization/International Electrotechnical Commission 9    17025:2017 regarding the general requirements for the 10    competence of testing and calibration laboratories;11        (2) uses an analytical method at least as sensitive as 12    the analytical method described in Section 4.7 of the U.S. 13    Food and Drug Administration Elemental Analysis Manual for 14    Food and Related Products; and15        (3) demonstrates, when using an independent 16    proficiency test, the achievement of a z-score within the 17    range of plus or minus 2 in quantifying each toxic element 18    to at least 6 micrograms of the toxic element per kilogram 19    of food.20    "QR code" means a machine-readable code, consisting of an 21array of squares, used for storing data that allows a user to 22access a webpage.23    "Representative sample" means a sample that consists of a 24number of units that are drawn based on rational criteria, 25such as random sampling, and intended to ensure that the 26sample accurately portrays the material being sampled.  SB0073 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 02950 RPS 12966 b1    "Toxic element" means arsenic, cadmium, lead, or mercury.2    (b) No person or entity shall sell or manufacture, 3deliver, or hold or offer for sale in this State any baby food 4that does not comply with the requirements of this Section.5    (c) Each manufacturer of baby food shall test a 6representative sample of each production aggregate of the 7manufacturer's final baby food product for toxic elements at a 8proficient laboratory.9    The testing required under this subsection shall be 10conducted by a proficient laboratory at least once per month.11    A manufacturer may test the final baby food product in 12accordance with this subsection before packaging individual 13units of baby food for sale or distribution.14    (d) Upon the request of the Department of Public Health, a 15manufacturer of baby food shall provide the results of the 16testing conducted under subsection (c) to an authorized agent 17of the Department of Public Health.18    (e) Beginning January 1, 2027, for final baby food 19products sold, manufactured, delivered, or held or offered for 20sale in this State, each manufacturer of baby food shall 21disclose product information to consumers consistent with the 22following:23        (1) The manufacturer shall make publicly available on 24    the manufacturer's website for each final baby food 25    product that it manufactures and for the duration of the 26    product shelf life for the final baby food product plus   SB0073 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 02950 RPS 12966 b1    one month:2            (A) the name and level of each toxic element 3        present in each production aggregate of a final baby 4        food product as determined by the testing conducted 5        under subsection (c); and6            (B) descriptive information, including, but not 7        limited to, the product's name, UPC, size, lot 8        numbers, or batch numbers, to enable accurate 9        identification of the final baby food product by 10        consumers.11        (2) If a product is tested for a certain toxic element 12    subject to an action level, regulatory limit, or tolerance 13    established by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration under 14    21 CFR 109, the manufacturer shall also include on the 15    baby food product label:16            (A) a statement that reads: "For information about 17        the toxic element testing on this product, scan the 18        Quick Response (QR) Code."; and19            (B) a QR code or other machine-readable code that 20        allows consumers to access the following information 21        on the manufacturer's website on the final baby food 22        product's information page:23                (i) the test results for the toxic elements; 24            and25                (ii) a link to the webpage on the U.S. Food and 26            Drug Administration website that includes the most   SB0073 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 02950 RPS 12966 b1            recent guidance and information about the health 2            effects of the toxic element on children.3    (f) The Department of Public Health shall implement a 4system for consumer reporting of baby foods under this 5subsection.